North Dakota, session 69, HB1606.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 54-06-14 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
54-06-14. Annual leave and sick leave for state employees.
Annual leave and sick leave must be provided for all personsindividuals in the permanent
employment of this state who are not employed under a written contract of hire setting forth the
terms and conditions of their employment, within the limitations, terms, and provisions of this
section. Annual leave for an employee entitled to it must be within a range of a minimum of one
working day per month of employment to a maximum of two working days per month of
employment, based on tenure of employment, to be fixed by rules adopted by the employing
unit. Sick leave for an employee entitled to it must be within a range of a minimum of one
working dayten hours per month of employment to a maximum of one and one-half working
days per month of employment, based on tenure of employment, to be fixed by rules adopted
by the employing unit. Annual leave must be compensated for on the basis of full pay for the
number of working days' leave credited to the employee. Sick leave must be compensated for
on the basis of full pay for absence due to illness on working days during tenure of employment.
An employee with at least ten continuous years of state employment is entitled to a lump sum
payment equal to one-tenth of the pay attributed to the employee's unused sick leave accrued
under this section. An employee's years of state employment must be deemed continuous if,
under the official personnel policy of an agency, unit, or entity, the employee's work is
terminated because of a reduction in force and the employee is reinstated in any agency, unit,
or entity within two years, or if the employee is placed on voluntary leave status without pay and
Page No. 1 25.1275.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
the leave lasts no longer than two years for education purposes, or one year for any other
voluntary leave without pay. The pay attributed to the accumulated, unused sick leave must be
computed on the basis of the employee's salary or wage at the time the employee leaves the
employ of the state and at the rate of one hour of pay for each hour of unused sick leave. The
agency, unit, or entity that last employed the employee shall make the lump sum payment from
funds appropriated by the legislative assembly to that agency, unit, or entity for salaries and
wages. Any state agency, unit, or entity which employs personsindividuals subject to this section
shall formulate and adopt rules governing the granting of annual leave and sick leave which will
effectuate the purpose of this section and best suit the factors of employment of that employing
unit. Each employing unit shall file with the office of management and budget a copy of the rules
adopted, including any amendments or additions to the rules.
Page No. 2 25.1275.01000